Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-952
Subject's rights; appear and testify; present witnesses and evidence.

A subject shall appear personally or by videoconferencing and be afforded the opportunity to testify in his or her own behalf and to present witnesses and tangible evidence in defending against the petition at the hearing.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 66;

Laws 1981, LB 95, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1056;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 72;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 117.